Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1084.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 153(a)(1) introductory paragraph of Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 153. Fee schedule.(a) General rule.--The nonrefundable fees of the bureau, including fees for the public acts and transactions of the Secretary of the Commonwealth administered through the bureau, shall be as follows:(1) Domestic corporations, except as provided in section 5332 (relating to exemption from certain fees AND SOLICITATION REQUIREMENTS FOR VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANIES ) :<--<--123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. Title 15 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5332. Exemption from certain fees AND SOLICITATION REQUIREMENTS FOR VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANIES . (a) Payment.--A volunteer fire company filing articles of incorporation under this chapter shall be exempt from the payment of the fee established under section 153(a)(1)(i) (relating to fee schedule).(A.1) SOLICITATION REQUIREMENTS EXEMPTION.--(1) A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY FILING ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION UNDER THIS CHAPTER SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS FOR SOLICITATION ESTABLISHED BY THE ACT OF DECEMBER 19, 1990 (P.L.1200, NO.202), KNOWN AS THE SOLICITATION OF FUNDS FOR CHARITABLE PURPOSES ACT.(2) A SUPPLIER, VENDOR OR PROFESSIONAL FUNDRAISING COUNSEL CONTRACTED BY A VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY FILING ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION UNDER THIS CHAPTER SHALL BE EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS FOR SOLICITATION ESTABLISHED UNDER THE SOLICITATION OF FUNDS FOR CHARITABLE PURPOSES ACT AS THOSE REQUIREMENTS RELATE TO ANY CONDUCT PERFORMED IN THE RAISING OF FUNDS FOR USE BY THE VOLUNTEER FIRE COMPANY.(b) Offenses.-- (1) If a person fraudulently obtains a fee exemption permitted under this section, the person commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) If a person assigns, transfers or attempts to assign or transfer a fee exemption or uses or attempts to use a fee exemption contrary to this section, the person commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Reporting.-- 20250HB1084PN1883 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The department shall annually determine the total number of fee exemptions applied for and issued and the total dollar amount of the fee exemptions under this section.(2) The department shall issue an annual report containing the information under paragraph (1).(3) Each report under paragraph (2) shall be transmitted, electronically or otherwise, to:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Volunteer fire company." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1084PN1883 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819